src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Paamese language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns

! Personal
inau+Pron+Pers+Sg1:inau #  ;
keik+Pron+Pers+Sg2:keik # ;
kei+Pron+Pers+Sg3:kei # ;
ialu+Pron+Pers+Du1+Incl:ialu # ;
komal+Pron+Pers+Du1+Excl:komal # ;
kamil+Pron+Pers+Du2:kamil # ;
keilu+Pron+Pers+Du3:keilu # ;
iatel+Pauc1+Incl:iatel # ;
komaitel+Pauc1+Excl:komaitel # ;
kamitel+Pauc2:kamitel # ;
keitel+Pauc3:keitel # ;
ir+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl:ir # ;
komaitel+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl:komaitel # ;
kami+Pron+Pers+Pl2:kami # ;
keil+Pron+Pers+Pl3:keil # ;

! Possessive
onen+Pron+Poss:ona px ;
emon+Pron+Poss:emo px ;
esen+Pron+Poss:esa px ;
aan+Pron+Poss:aa px ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
